North Carolina, session 2025, SB949.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of three hundred fifty-nine million three hundred thousand dollars
($359,300,000) in recurring funds beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to increase the School
Health Personnel Allotment. These funds shall be used to establish a tiered system of support for
students by increasing positions for the following school health support personnel in order to
meet the following statewide ratios:
(1) At least one school psychologist for every 700 students.
(2) At least one school counselor for every 250 students.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*S949-v-1*